Utah statutes.
16-11-3.   Purpose of act.

This act shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose of making available to professional persons the benefits of the corporate form for the business aspects of their practices while preserving the established professional aspects of the personal relationship between the professional person and those he serves.



Enacted by Chapter 20, 1963 General Session

